Hawaii statutes.
[§277-3] Acquisition of lands. The
director of transportation in the name of the State and subject to the approval
of the governor may for the purposes of this chapter acquire, by purchase or
eminent domain, private property in fee simple, or any lesser interest therein,
including leases, all property necessary for the establishment, maintenance,
operation, management and control of energy corridors. [L 1970, c 33, §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next